Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB892.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1617. Transition Coordinators in Senior High Schools.--(a) Each school district shall hire at least one full-time dedicated and highly qualified or credentialed transition coordinator for each senior high school of the school district. The Department of Education may require a school district to hire additional transition coordinators for a senior high school of the school district depending on the population of the senior high school.(b) Each full-time transition coordinator shall perform, on 1234567891011121314151617181920 a full-time basis, transition coordinator duties, including individualizing community-based activities with an emphasis on employment, in accordance with the provisions of the act of June 19, 2018 (P.L.229, No.36), known as the "Employment First Act."(c) The Department of Education shall ensure compliance with this section.(d) As used in this section, the term "transition coordinator" shall mean an individual tasked with developing, coordinating and implementing career readiness and transition services, including:(1) Skill development.(2) Development of individualized plans.(3) Development of relationships with external entities to promote and implement:(i) Student placement.(ii) Instruction to students.(iii) Coordination of job placement and transportation.(iv) Progress monitoring.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0892PN0932 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819